Arkansas, session 2025, HB1954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to add additional
language concerning qualified behavior analysts to the Arkansas Behavior
Analyst Registration Act under HB1245 of 202 which has been transmitted to
the Governor's Office but has not been signed as an act at this time.
(b) This act does not repeal the Arkansas Behavior Analyst
Registration Act under HB1245 of 2025.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 17, Subchapter 97, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 6 — Behavior Analysts

17-97-601. Title.
*JMB575*
04/01/2025 1:00:49 PM JMB575

HB1954
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas
Behavior Analyst Registration Act".

17-97-602. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, "registered behavior analyst" means an
individual who is registered to practice behavior analysis independently by
the Arkansas Psychology Board under this subchapter.

17-97-603. Unlawful practice of applied behavior analysis.
(a) Unless registered under this subchapter, a person shall not:
(1) Hold himself or herself out to be a registered behavior
analyst; or
(2) Use any combination or abbreviation of the term "registered
behavior analyst" to indicate or imply that he or she is a registered
behavior analyst.
(b)(1) A person found to be in violation of subsection (a) of this
section is subject to a fine of no less than five hundred dollars ($500) and
no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) A person registered under this subchapter who violates this
subchapter is subject to administrative sanctions and penalties, including
without limitation a fine of no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and
revocation of his or her registration.

17-97-604. Registration.
(a) Each applicant for registration as a registered behavior analyst
shall submit to the Arkansas Psychology Board:
(1) An application;
(2) An application fee that does not exceed two hundred dollars
($200);
(3) Evidence that he or she has successfully completed a
criminal background check; and
(4) Evidence that he or she is certified as:
(A) A board certified behavior analyst or a board
certified behavior analyst-doctoral by the Behavior Analyst Certification
Board, Inc.; or
(B) A qualified behavior analyst by the Qualified Applied
04/01/2025 1:00:49 PM JMB575

HB1954
Behavior Analysis Credentialing Board.
(b) This section does not require additional training or
continuing education with any state or national association.

17-97-605. Expiration and renewal.
(a) A registration under this subchapter shall be granted for a period
of two (2) years.
(b) Before expiration of a registration, the registration may be
renewed upon the submission of:
(1) A renewal application;
(2) A renewal fee that does not exceed one hundred fifty dollars
($150); and
(3) Evidence of verification of current certification.
(c) This section does not require additional training or continuing
education with any state or national association.

17-97-606. Temporary registration.
(a)(1) A behavior analyst licensed in another jurisdiction or who
holds current certification as a board certified behavior analyst, board
certified behavior analyst-doctoral, board certified assistant behavior
analyst, or equivalent, issued by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board,
Inc., or its equivalent approved by the Arkansas Psychology Board to practice
independently who provides applied behavior analysis services in this state
on a short-term basis may apply for a temporary registration.
(2) A behavior analyst licensed in another jurisdiction or who
holds current certification as a qualified behavior analyst by the Qualified
Applied Behavior Analysis Credentialing Board or its equivalent approved by
the Arkansas Psychology Board to practice independently who provides applied
behavior analysis services in this state on a short-term basis may apply for
a temporary registration.
(b) An applicant for a temporary registration shall submit an
application and fee established by the Arkansas Psychology Board and evidence
that his or her practice in the jurisdiction will be temporary as defined by
the Arkansas Psychology Board in rules.
(c) A temporary registration shall be granted only if the Arkansas
Psychology Board verifies the applicant’s licensure or certification status
04/01/2025 1:00:49 PM JMB575

HB1954
with the relevant entity.

17-97-607. Reciprocity.
(a) The Arkansas Psychology Board may issue a registration to a person
who is currently licensed as a behavior analyst in good standing in another
jurisdiction that imposes requirements comparable to those specified in this
subchapter, including holding a current certification as:
(1) A board certified behavior analyst or a board certified
behavior analyst-doctoral or equivalent, issued by the Behavior Analyst
Certification Board, Inc., or its equivalent; or
(2) A qualified behavior analyst by the Qualified Applied
Behavior Analysis Credentialing Board.
(b) An applicant for reciprocal registration under this section shall
have current licensure or certificate verified by the Arkansas Psychology
Board and comply with other requirements under § 17-97-604.

17-97-608. Regulation by Arkansas Psychology Board.
(a) The Arkansas Psychology Board shall administer the provisions of
this subchapter and may adopt rules that are reasonable and necessary to
implement the provisions of this subchapter.
(b) The Arkansas Psychology Board may adopt the Ethics Code for
Behavior Analysts issued by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Inc.,
as existing on January 1, 2025, and the Code of Ethics issued by the
Qualified Applied Behavior Analysis Credentialing Board.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-97-201(a)(3), concerning the creation
and members of the Arkansas Psychology Board, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(D) At least one (1) of the members appointed under
subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be a licensed psychologist who is a
board certified behavior analyst, qualified behavior analyst, or has a
background and experience providing behavior analysis services.




04/01/2025 1:00:49 PM JMB575